Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RECONNECT RONDO PROJECT; PROHIBITION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "ReConnect Rondo project" means the proposed land bridge or freeway cap over Interstate Highway 94 between Chatsworth Street and Grotto Street in the city of St. Paul. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation must not expend any money for studying, planning, preliminary engineering, final design, or construction for the ReConnect Rondo project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities, the expenditure of federal money, and any previous unexpended appropriations made for this purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council must not expend any money for studying, planning, preliminary engineering, final design, or construction for the ReConnect Rondo project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities, the expenditure of federal money, and any previous unexpended appropriations made for this purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end